Hawaii statutes.
[§321-194] State advisory commission.
The state advisory commission on drug abuse and controlled substances
established in section 329-2 shall advise the director on all matters relating
to substance abuse including but not limited to the preparation of the state
plan for substance abuse. In addition, the advisory commission shall perform
such duties and assume such responsibilities as required by federal law for the
purpose of receiving federal funding. [L 1975, c 190, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol06_Ch0321-0344
Next